tr_test.dic
kaparozlamak/ѝ
kadastrolamak/ѝ
şavullamak/ѝ
burcumak/ѝ
ululamak/ѝ
kataloglamak/ѝ
doruklamak/ѝ
okumak/ѝ
soğuklamak/ѝ
zonklamak/ѝ
olumlamak/ѝ
otamak/ѝ
soyutlamak/ѝ
mantolamak/ѝ
foşurdamak/ѝ
omuzlamak/ѝ
cumbuldamak/ѝ
sumsuklamak/ѝ
arzulamak/ѝ
kurumak/ѝ
yavrulamak/ѝ
hortumlamak/ѝ
olurlamak/ѝ
karbonlamak/ѝ
efsunlamak/ѝ
oklamak/ѝ
horlamak/ѝ
pomak/ѝ
ucuzlamak/ѝ
boşlamak/ѝ
hoplamak/ѝ
moruklamak/ѝ
okramak/ѝ
hohlamak/ѝ
yumurtlamak/ѝ
takozlamak/ѝ
uğurlamak/ѝ
havuzlamak/ѝ
doğrulamak/ѝ
toplamak/ѝ
mortlamak/ѝ
yoğurtlamak/ѝ
yumruklamak/ѝ
agulamak/ѝ
çimentolamak/ѝ
çullamak/ѝ
uğrulamak/ѝ
tutuklamak/ѝ
sonuçlamak/ѝ
uğramak/ѝ
koşullamak/ѝ
kurşunlamak/ѝ
ozonlamak/ѝ
stoklamak/ѝ
cumburdamak/ѝ
gurlamak/ѝ
kodlamak/ѝ
rötuşlamak/ѝ
mahmuzlamak/ѝ
konuklamak/ѝ
uygulamak/ѝ
unlamak/ѝ
kovlamak/ѝ
bulgurlamak/ѝ
oynamak/ѝ
bunamak/ѝ
yumak/ѝ
duyumsamak/ѝ
çoğumsamak/ѝ
solumak/ѝ
yoksamak/ѝ
koltuklamak/ѝ
anaforlamak/ѝ
durulamak/ѝ
hortlamak/ѝ
suçlamak/ѝ
afsunlamak/ѝ
dokumak/ѝ
gruplamak/ѝ
akortlamak/ѝ
balonlamak/ѝ
boncuklamak/ѝ
bromlamak/ѝ
burumak/ѝ
fokuslamak/ѝ
kaskolamak/ѝ
konçlamak/ѝ
koşuklamak/ѝ
potlamak/ѝ
sarhoşlamak/ѝ
uylamak/ѝ
yolculamak/ѝ
yurdulamak/ѝ
çinkolamak/ѝ
addolunma/ѝ
affolunma/ѝ
alıkonulma/ѝ
arabulma/ѝ
avunma/ѝ
avutma/ѝ
azlolunma/ѝ
bakadurma/ѝ
başvurdurma/ѝ
başvurulma/ѝ
bekleyekoyma/ѝ
bozdurtma/ѝ
bozma/ѝ
bozundurma/ѝ
bozuşma/ѝ
boğdurma/ѝ
boğdurulma/ѝ
boğulma/ѝ
boğuşulma/ѝ
buldurtma/ѝ
bulundurma/ѝ
bulunma/ѝ
buluşturma/ѝ
buluşulma/ѝ
burdurma/ѝ
burkma/ѝ
burulma/ѝ
buruşturma/ѝ
buydurma/ѝ
buyrulma/ѝ
coşma/ѝ
coşturulma/ѝ
devrolma/ѝ
dokundurma/ѝ
dokunma/ѝ
dokutma/ѝ
doldurtma/ѝ
dolduruşçu/ѝ
doluşma/ѝ
donma/ѝ
doyulma/ѝ
doyurulma/ѝ
doğrulma/ѝ
doğulma/ѝ
doğurtma/ѝ
durdurtma/ѝ
durma/ѝ
durultma/ѝ
duyulma/ѝ
duyurtma/ѝ
dışavurma/ѝ
gadrolma/ѝ
gaşyolma/ѝ
gocundurma/ѝ
hallolma/ѝ
hapsolma/ѝ
hissolunma/ѝ
kahrolma/ѝ
kavurtma/ѝ
kavuşturma/ѝ
kaybolma/ѝ
kokma/ѝ
kokuşlu/ѝ
kokuşturma/ѝ
kondurtma/ѝ
konulma/ѝ
konuşmamak/ѝ
konuşturtma/ѝ
kopma/ѝ
korkulma/ѝ
korkutulma/ѝ
korunulma/ѝ
kovdurma/ѝ
kovma/ѝ
kovuşturma/ѝ
koydurma/ѝ
koyma/ѝ
koyultma/ѝ
koçuşma/ѝ
koşturma/ѝ
koşturulma/ѝ
koşuşma/ѝ
kudurma/ѝ
kurdurma/ѝ
kurma/ѝ
kurtuluşlu/ѝ
kurutma/ѝ
kusma/ѝ
kuğurma/ѝ
lağvolunma/ѝ
menolunma/ѝ
nakşolunma/ѝ
ocuma/ѝ
okunma/ѝ
okutma/ѝ
okutulma/ѝ
oladurma/ѝ
oldurma/ѝ
olma/ѝ
oluşma/ѝ
oluşturtma/ѝ
ona/ѝ
onma/ѝ
osurma/ѝ
oturma/ѝ
oturtturma/ѝ
oturulma/ѝ
ovdurma/ѝ
ovma/ѝ
ovunma/ѝ
oydurma/ѝ
oyulma/ѝ
pufla/ѝ
pusturma/ѝ
sanadurma/ѝ
savulma/ѝ
savunulma/ѝ
savurtma/ѝ
savuşturma/ѝ
sokturma/ѝ
sokturtulma/ѝ
sokulma/ѝ
sokuşturma/ѝ
soldurtulma/ѝ
solma/ѝ
solutma/ѝ
somurtma/ѝ
sordurma/ѝ
sorma/ѝ
soruma/ѝ
soruşma/ѝ
soruşturulma/ѝ
soydurulma/ѝ
soyulma/ѝ
soyundurtma/ѝ
soyundurulma/ѝ
soğrulma/ѝ
soğuma/ѝ
soğutma/ѝ
soğuşma/ѝ
sundurtulma/ѝ
sunma/ѝ
susma/ѝ
susturtma/ѝ
susturulma/ѝ
sırrolma/ѝ
tokuşturma/ѝ
tomurma/ѝ
tozma/ѝ
tutma/ѝ
tutulma/ѝ
tutunma/ѝ
tutuşturma/ѝ
uluma/ѝ
umdurma/ѝ
umulma/ѝ
unutturma/ѝ
unutulma/ѝ
utma/ѝ
uydurulma/ѝ
uyulma/ѝ
uyunma/ѝ
uyutulma/ѝ
uyuşturma/ѝ
uçurma/ѝ
uçurulma/ѝ
uçuşturma/ѝ
vahyolunma/ѝ
vurdurtma/ѝ
vurma/ѝ
vuruşma/ѝ
yamrulma/ѝ
yamultma/ѝ
yazadurma/ѝ
yoldurma/ѝ
yolma/ѝ
yolunma/ѝ
yontma/ѝ
yonulma/ѝ
yordurtma/ѝ
yortma/ѝ
yoğrulma/ѝ
yoğurtma/ѝ
yoğuşturma/ѝ
yumma/ѝ
yumulma/ѝ
yutkunma/ѝ
yutturma/ѝ
yutulma/ѝ
zehrolma/ѝ
çabalayadurma/ѝ
kodlamak/ѝ
fonlamak/ѝ
